Hawaii, session 2025, HB408.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 11-16, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) Any qualified person unable for any cause to appear in person before the clerk for registration may register to vote by mail, not later than [thirty] ten days prior to a primary or general election, through the affidavit on application for voter registration or other form prescribed by the chief election officer.  The form shall include a self‑subscribing oath for the applicant to swear to the truth of the allegations in the application.  An applicant unable to write for reason of illiteracy, blindness, or other physical disability shall have the applicant's mark witnessed by a person who shall sign the affidavit in the space provided. [Each application form shall also include a space to request a permanent absentee ballot.] Application forms shall be made available to any qualified person through community groups, political parties, and other groups prescribed by the chief election officer.  Application forms shall be made available to any qualified person at the time of that person's driver's license application or renewal through the examiner of drivers." SECTION 2.  Section 15D-6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  A covered voter may use the declaration accompanying a federal write-in absentee ballot to apply to register to vote simultaneously with the submission of the federal write-in absentee ballot, if it is received no later than [thirty] ten days prior to the election pursuant to section 11-16." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ By Request